District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1253.01

Cable Television Advisory Committee.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 301
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 262(c), 62 DCR 1884

History

This section is referenced in § 34-1251.03.

Section References

For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 262(c) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 262(c) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).

Emergency Legislation